src/case.regex
a (->) A, b (->) B, v (->) V, g (->) G, d (->) D, e (->) E,
i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N,
o (->) O, p (->) P, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U,
f (->) F, h (->) H, c (->) C, y (->) Y || .#. _ ;
